Massachusetts, session 194th, H3668.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Chelsea”, in line 89, the following
words:- , the city of Revere.
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of said section 13 of said chapter 6C, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- The
department shall establish a zone-based toll discount program for account holders who: (i)
participate in the department’s electronic toll collection system; and (ii) are residents in
municipalities north of the city of Boston that are located adjacent to United States highway
route 1. The program shall provide discounted tolls for private passenger vehicles for transit
through the Sumner tunnel and the Ted Williams tunnel and over the Maurice J. Tobin Memorial
Bridge based upon each municipality’s proximity to those toll collection sites.
of 2

SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, the Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall:
(i) charge or collect a toll for use of the Maurice J. Tobin Memorial Bridge by private
passenger vehicles registered in the city of Revere, the town of Winthrop and Essex county in the
same amount as it does for such vehicles registered in the city of Chelsea; and
(i) charge or collect a toll for use of the Sumner tunnel by private passenger vehicles
registered in the city of Revere, the city of Chelsea, the town of Winthrop and Essex county in
the same amount as it does for such vehicles registered in the East Boston neighborhood of the
city of Boston.
of 2